Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF2023.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin TRANSFER; HELP AMERICA VOTE ACT STATE MATCHING FUNDS.new text end new text begin $200,000 in fiscal year 2026 is transferred from the general fund to the Help America Vote Act account established in Minnesota Statutes, section 5.30, and is credited to the state match requirement of the Further Consolidated Appropriations Act of 2024, Public Law 118-47. new text end